District of Columbia statutes.
47-847

Sale of tax delinquent property — Issuance of deed to District; redemption.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever any real property in the District of Columbia has been, or shall hereafter be, offered for sale for nonpayment of taxes or assessments of any kind whatsoever, and shall have been bid off in the name of the District of Columbia, and 6 months or more have elapsed since such property was bid off as aforesaid, and the same has not been redeemed as provided by law, the Mayor of the District may enforce the lien of the District for taxes or other assessments on such real property by ordering that a deed in fee simple to such property be issued by the Mayor of the District of Columbia to the District of Columbia, and up to the time of the issuance of the deed such property may be redeemed by the owner or other person having an interest therein by the payment of all taxes or assessments due the District of Columbia upon said property, and all legal penalties, interests and costs thereon, together with such other expenses and costs, including costs of publication, as may have been incurred by the District.

(b)

The time period for redemption of properties brought to tax sale under § 47-1205(b), shall be 6 months.

(c)

The time period for redemption of properties brought to tax sale under § 8-807(f), shall be 6 months.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1059, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 437
Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-135, § 14(e), 33 DCR 3771
Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-31,§ 5(e), 36 DCR 4750
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 104(c), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
District of Columbia administration, purchasing and contracting procedures, exemptions, see § 2-303.20.
Homestead Housing Preservation Program, transfer of properties acquired under this section, see § 42-2104.
Litter control, fines and penalties, liens on real property, see § 8-807.
Real property tax sales, notice to record owner and public auction, see § 47-1301.
Special assessments, nuisance abatement, delinquencies, see § 47-1205.
This section is referenced in § 42-2104, § 42-2105.01, § 47-848, and § 47-1205.
1981 Ed., § 47-847.
1973 Ed., § 47-657.
Delegation of Mayor’s Authority to Issue Tax Deeds to the District of Columbia to the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, see Mayor’s Order 2003-162, November 18, 2003 ( 50 DCR 10602).
Delegation of Mayor’s Authority to Issue Tax Deeds Pursuant to the Mayor’s Authority under D.C. Official Code § 47-847 to the Chief Property Management Officer, see Mayor’s Order 2004-193, November 26, 2004 ( 51 DCR 11373).
Delegation of Authority to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development, see Mayor’s Order 2007-209, September 27, 2007 ( 55 DCR 133).